Illinois, session 104th, HB517.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Paid Leave for All Workers Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 192/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Paid 8Leave for All Workers Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24.)